prince/dictionaries/lt.aff
SET ISO8859-13
TRY iastnokreuldvėmgpjšbyžūczfčhąįųęwxq
PFX r Y 2
PFX r 0       pasi            .         
PFX r 0       nepasi          .         

PFX s Y 2
PFX s 0       parsi           .         
PFX s 0       neparsi         .         

PFX p Y 2
PFX p 0       išsi            .         
PFX p 0       neišsi          .         

PFX q Y 2
PFX q 0       nusi            .         
PFX q 0       nenusi          .         

PFX v Y 2
PFX v 0       prisi           .         
PFX v 0       neprisi         .         

PFX w Y 2
PFX w 0       susi            .         
PFX w 0       nesusi          .         

PFX t Y 2
PFX t 0       persi           .         
PFX t 0       nepersi         .         

PFX u Y 2
PFX u 0       prasi           .         
PFX u 0       neprasi         .         

PFX x Y 2
PFX x 0       užsi            .         
PFX x 0       neužsi          .         

PFX b Y 4
PFX b 0       ati             [dt]      
PFX b 0       at              [^dt]     
PFX b 0       neati           [dt]      
PFX b 0       neat            [^dt]     

PFX c Y 2
PFX c 0       į               .         
PFX c 0       neį             .         

PFX a Y 4
PFX a 0       api             [pb]      
PFX a 0       ap              [^pb]     
PFX a 0       neapi           [pb]      
PFX a 0       neap            [^pb]     

PFX f Y 2
PFX f 0       pa              .         
PFX f 0       nepa            .         

PFX g Y 2
PFX g 0       par             .         
PFX g 0       nepar           .         

PFX d Y 2
PFX d 0       iš              .         
PFX d 0       neiš            .         

PFX e Y 2
PFX e 0       nu              .         
PFX e 0       nenu            .         

PFX j Y 2
PFX j 0       pri             .         
PFX j 0       nepri           .         

PFX k Y 2
PFX k 0       su              .         
PFX k 0       nesu            .         

PFX h Y 2
PFX h 0       per             .         
PFX h 0       neper           .         

PFX i Y 2
PFX i 0       pra             .         
PFX i 0       nepra           .         

PFX n Y 2
PFX n 0       atsi            .         
PFX n 0       neatsi          .         

PFX o Y 2
PFX o 0       įsi             .         
PFX o 0       neįsi           .         

PFX l Y 2
PFX l 0       už              .         
PFX l 0       neuž            .         

PFX m Y 2
PFX m 0       apsi            .         
PFX m 0       neapsi          .         

PFX S Y 6
PFX S 0       ne              .         
PFX S 0       nebe            .         
PFX S 0       nesi            .         
PFX S 0       nebesi          .         
PFX S 0       besi            .         
PFX S 0       tebesi          .         
