prince/dictionaries/lt.dic
baigti/TSXdfjklpqr
bandyti/TSXdfprv
barsto/ESXacdefhlmnopqrtvx
bėgioti/TNXdfknpqruv
bėgti/TNXabcdefghijl
beldžia/ESXfnpqrv
byrėti/TNXabcdejk
blokuoti/TSXbklnwx
braižyti/TSXacdefhjknopqrtvx
braškėjo/PNXbcdfk
braukia/ESXadefhilmnoprx
braukti/TSXadefhilmnoprx
brauti/TSXcopstu
bristi/TNXbcdegh
brovė/PSXcopstu
bujojo/PSXdkl
bunda/ENXbdefin
buriuoja/ESXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvx
buriuoti/TSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvx
but/YSXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
dainavo/PSXabcdefhklqruvw
dairė/YSXmr
darė/YSXbcdfhijklnrtuvwx
darinėja/ENXbcdehklnpx
daryti/TSXbcdfhijklnrtuvwx
daugino/PSXfhjkrvw
daužė/SXYabdefijkmnopqruvwx
davė/PSXbcdfghjklnprstwx
degė/PNXacdefhijklopvx
degina/ESXacdefhijkmopqruvw
degino/PSXacdefhijkmopqruvw
deginti/TSXacdefhijkmopqruvw
dekomponuoti/TNXfr
dėlioja/ESXabdfhijknptuvw
dėliojo/PSXabdfhijknptuvw
dėlioti/TSXabdfhijknptuvw
dengė/PSXabdefhijlmnqrtuvx
dengia/ESXabdefhijlmnqrtuvx
derinti/TSXdefhjkopqrtuvw
dėti/TSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
didino/PSXdfhlpr
dirba/ESXabcdefhijklmopqrtvwx
doroti/TSXabfkmnrw
dovanoti/TNXadfjmr
drėbti/TSXacdefjlmoqrv
driekė/PSXepq
drožia/ESXadefhjknpqrv
dubliuoja/ESX
duoda/ESXbcdfghjklnprstwx
dvigubina/ESXfrw
ėda/ENXadefjklmnptv
eidinėja/ENXabcdeghijl
eidinėjo/PNXabcdeghijl
eidinėti/TNXabcdeghijl
ėjo/PSXabcdefghijklmnovwx
eksperimentuoja/ENXfv
eksportavo/PNXd
ėsti/TNXadefjklmnptv
fiksuoti/TSXlx
filtruoja/ESXabdefhinv
formavo/PSXdfhkptw
formulavo/PNXhkw
formuoja/ESXdfhkptw
fotografavo/PSXdefhijqruv
fotografuoti/TSXdefhijqruv
gabena/ESXbdegjnpqstvwx
gabenti/TSXbdegjnpqstvwx
gadinti/TSXadfkmprw
gaišta/ENXeikl
galioja/ENXco
gamino/PSXbfjnrv
gando/PNXpqt
gaudė/SYXdfjkprvw
gaudyti/TSXdfjkprvw
gauti/TSXabcdfjklmnopqrwx
gavo/PSXabcdfjklmnopqrwx
gedo/PNXfkr
geria/ESXdefijklnoqrtuvwx
gijo/NYXabcdefjklo
gimė/PNXbclmnp
ginčyti/STeXfpruvw
gydė/YSXadefjklprx
gydyti/TSXadefjklprx
gyvena/ESXabdfhijkmoquvw
gyveno/PSXabdfhijkmoquvw
grasina/ENXbfj
griauti/TSXacdefgkluvwx
griebia/ESXdefjklnpqrvwx
griūva/ENXacdefgjkl
griuvo/PNXacdefgjkl
grupuoja/ESXfhjktvw
grupuoti/TSXfhjktvw
gula/ESXabdejkln
ima/ESXabdefhijklmnpqrtuvwx
instaliavo/PSXdfhjkloptvw
instaliuoti/TSXdfhjkloptvw
investavo/PSXhjktvw
irti/TNXadik
yrė/PSXbejqv
joja/ESXabcdefghijkl
jojo/PSXabcdefghijkl
junginėja/ESXabcdfhjkoptvw
junginėti/TSXabcdfhjkoptvw
jungti/TSXabcdfhjkmnoprtvw
juokia/ESXadfmnpqrvw
juosti/TSXaemptwx
kala/ESXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
kalbinti/TNXbcfhijl
kalti/TSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
kanda/ENXabcdehiklnoqx
kankinti/TSXdefjlnqrv
kapojo/PNXabcdefjklrvwx
kąsti/TNXabcdehiklnoqx
kaupti/TSXajkmvw
keičia/ESXabcdfhkmnprtvw
kelti/TSXbcdefhjklnopqrtvwx
kepa/ESXacdefhjklprvx
kerpa/ESXabcdefhijkmnopqrtuvw
kerta/ESXbcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
kibti/TSXabcfjklow
kimba/ESXabcfjklow
kirpti/TSXabcdefhijkmnopqrtuvw
kirto/PSXbcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
klaidžioti/TNXefinqrv
klausinėja/ESXadfhlmnpqrx
klausinėti/TSXadfhlmnpqrx
klausti/TNXadfhlnr
klojo/PSXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
klosto/ESXabeklmnqwx
kloti/TSXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
kombinuoja/ESXfj
komplektavo/PNXdhkptw
konstruoja/ENXcfhjknotvwx
kontroliavo/PSXfkqvw
konvertavo/PSXhkntvw
konvertuoja/ESXhkntvw
krato/ESXbdefknpqruvwx
krauna/ESXacdefhjklmopqrtvwx
krauti/TSXacdefhjklmopqrtvwx
krečia/ENXacdefjklmopqvwx
kreipė/PSXbdefhprtw
kūrena/ESXacdfijkoprv
kūrė/NPSXbcefghijklortvwx
kuria/ESXbcefghijklortvwx
kviečia/ESXdfjklprvwx
laidojo/PSXfhrt
laikė/SYXbdefhijklnpqrstvwx
laikyti/TSXbdefhijklnpqrstvwx
laisto/ESXadfhjkmprvw
lakstyti/TNXadfiknv
lankstė/SXYabcdefhijklnptuvwx
laužyti/TSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
laužti/TSXbcdefhijklmnoqtvw
legalizuoti/TSX
leido/PSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
lėkti/TNXabcdefghijkl
lenkė/PSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lenkia/ESXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lenkti/TSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lėtino/PSXfhjkrtvx
linguoja/ENXbcdefgijklnor
linguoti/TNXbcdefgijklnor
lipo/PSXabcdefghjkloqrx
lipti/TSXabcdefghjkloqrx
lįsti/TNXbcdefhijklowx
lygina/ESXbdefhjklnrvwx
lyginti/TSXbdefhjklnrvwx
lyti/NUXacefhijkl
lūžti/TNXabcdefhijkl
maišė/SYXcdfhjkloprtvwx
maišo/ESXcdfhjkloprtvwx
manyti/TNXcdefiklqux
mąstė/YNXafhkw
mato/ESXaefhjlqrtw
mauna/ESXacdefhiklmopqrtvwx
mažėja/ENXaefk
metė/PSXabcdefhijklmoqrtwx
metinėja/ENXadefhimq
miegoti/TSXbdfilmnptvx
migo/PNXceikl
minti/TSXbcfdefgijklnoqvx
miršta/ENXadefjlrvx
moka/ESXabcdfhjklmnoprtvwx
montavo/PSXbcdehjklnopqtvwx
movė/PSXacdefhiklmopqrtvwx
muša/ESXabcdefghijklmnopqrtuvwx
nagrinėja/ESXdefhpr
naudoti/TSXdfkprvw
neša/ESXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
nešė/PSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
nešioja/ESXadefijklmnpqruvwx
nešioti/TSXadefijklmnpqruvwx
nešti/TSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
nuomoja/ESXdhp
optimizuoti/TSXfk
organizavo/PSXfhjknrtw
pakavo/PSXcdhkoptw
pasakoja/ESXbdefhjkprv
perėjo/PNXdjpv
perka/ESXabcdefhijklmnpqvwx
piešė/PSXacdefhijlnoqrtv
pildė/NPSYXbdfhjlprtvx
pjovė/PSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvw
plakė/PSXdehjklpqtvwx
planavo/PSXdefhjkvwx
platinti/TSXdfipru
plaukė/PNXabcdefghijkl
plojo/PSXacfijklovw
plovė/PSXadefhijkmpqrtuvw
pramogauja/ENXfivx
prausti/TSXabdemnpq
programuoja/ESXfhjklnrvwx
pučia/ESXbcdefghijklnpqrsuv
puolė/PNXabcdefgijklx
pūsti/TSXbcdefghijklnpqrsuv
pusto/ESXbcdefjklpr
pūtė/PSXbcdefghijklnpqrsuv
rado/PSXbdiknpsw
rakino/PSXbjklnvwx
rašinėja/ENXabcdefhjklmnpqrtvwx
rašinėti/TNXabcdefhjklmnpqrtvwx
rasti/TSXbdiknpsw
rauti/TSXabcdefhijklnopqrstuvwx
regi/ENXi
registravo/PSXcdfhjkloptvx
reiškė/PSXadfmpr
rėmė/PSXabcfjklnorwx
remti/TSXabcfjklnorwx
rengė/PSXacdefhjkmopqrtv
rengia/ESXacdefhjkmopqrtv
rengti/TSXacdefhjkmopqrtv
rinkti/TSXbdefhjknprtvw
rišo/PSXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
ryja/ESXbeijkmqtv
ryškino/PSXdfpr
rūkė/YNXadefgijklmpvx
rūpinti/TSXadfjmr
sako/ESXabcdefhjklnorvwx
sąla/ENXa
šalti/TNXabcdefhjkl
šaudo/ESXabdfijkmnpruw
saugo/PSXadfklmprx
segė/PSXabcdejklnopqvwx
segti/TSXabcdejklnopqvwx
siaurino/PNXfkrw
sieti/TSXbknw
šildė/YSXabcfhjkmnrtvw
šildo/ESXabcfhjkmnrtvw
siunčia/ESXbdefghijknpqrstvw
siuntė/PSXbdefghijknpqrstvw
skaičiavo/PSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
skaičiuoja/ESXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
skaityti/TSXcdefhjklmnoqrtvx
skalbia/ESXabdefhijkmnopqtvx
skalbti/TSXabdefhijkmnopqtvx
skamba/ENXbdefikl
skerdė/PSXdfjprv
skyrė/NPSXbcdfhjnprtuv
sklaidyti/TSXdfhipru
skleidžia/ESXbdfhijklmnruvwx
skolina/ESXdfimoruv
slaugo/ENXaf
šliaužė/PSXabcdefghijkl
šliaužia/ESXabcdefghijkl
slinko/PSXbcdefjlqrtv
smego/PNXcik
smigti/TNXcefikl
šnekėjo/PSXabcdefhijklnopqrvwx
snigo/PNXafijlo
šokinėjo/PNXabcdefghijklnpruvx
sotino/PSXcfhjortv
šovė/PSXabcdefhqt
spausdina/ESXbcdhjnoptv
spėlioja/ENXf
stabdo/ESXfjklrw
statinėja/ENXabcehjklmtvw
stebėti/TSXfnq
steigė/PSXcjov
stovėjo/PSXbdefinoqvwx
studentauti/TSXbfhjlnoqrstuvwx
stumdo/ESXadefhijkmpqruw
stumia/ESXbcdefghijklnopqrstuvwx
stumti/TSXbcdefghijklnopqrstuvwx
sukinėti/TSXbcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
sukti/TSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
svaičiojo/PSXcfhijkloprtuv
svaigti/TNXa
svėrė/PSXbefhrt
sveria/ESXbefhrt
tampė/YSXabdefijkmpruvw
tarti/TSXabcdefhijklmpqrtuvwx
teigia/ENXceo
teisinti/TSXcdfopr
temo/PNXajkl
tempė/PSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstvwx
tempia/ESXabcdefghijklmnopqrstvwx
tepa/ESXacdefhklmpqrwx
tepė/PSXacdefhklmpqrwx
tepti/TSXacdefhklmpqrwx
terliojo/PSXadfjklmpvw
terlioti/TSXadfjklmpvw
tęsia/ESXdefijlpqruvx
tikrino/PSXafhiklrtuvwx
tildyti/TNXefjlrvx
tyko/ENXefi
traukė/NPSXabcdefghijklmnopqrvwx
trenkė/PSXbdegjklnpqsvwx
trina/ESXacdefhikmopqrtvw
trynė/NPSXacdefhikmopqrtvw
trūko/PNXbcdefhijkl
turėti/TSXadefikr
turtėjo/PNXdi
tvirtino/PSXcfjklorvwx
vadino/PSXdfhkqrt
vaduoja/ENXdflp
vaikščioja/ESXabdefhijkmnopqrtuvx
vaipyti/TSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
valė/SYXadefimpqruv
valgyti/TSXadefijklmnpqrtvw
valgo/ESXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
valgo/ESXadefijklmnpqrtvw
valo/ESXadefimpqruv
varė/SYXabcdefghjklmnoqsuvw
varyti/TSXabcdefghjklmnoqsuvw
važinėjo/PSXabdfijklnruv
vedinėja/ENXbcdefhjklnopqstvx
verda/ESXadefhjklprvx
vesti/TSXabcdefghijklmnopqrsvwx
veža/ESXabcdefghijklnopqstvwx
vežti/TSXabcdefghijklnopqstvwx
vilko/PSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstvwx
virsti/TNXabcdefgkl
vynioja/ESXabcdehjklmnopqtvwx
vyniojo/PSXabcdehjklmnopqtvwx
vynioti/TSXabcdehjklmnopqtvwx
vogti/TNXadefjmqrv
žadino/PNXfjkrv
žavėti/TSXaklw
žeisti/TNXcfkow
žengti/TNXbcdefhqu
žingsniuoti/TSXabcdefghijkloqtv
žiūri/ESXacdefhijkmnoqrtuvwx
žiūrinėjo/PSXacdefhjkoq
žvelgė/PSXacefhimnoqrtw
žviegti/TNXfklqvwx
